Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-508.02
Streets; grading and repair; bridges and sewers; tax limits.

For purposes of section 17-508, cities of the second class and villages shall have power to levy in any one year not to exceed ten and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property within the limits of such cities and villages.

Laws 1879, § 69, III, p. 211;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, III, p. 173;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, III, p. 163;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, III, p. 291;

Laws 1903, c. 20, § 1, p. 248;

R.S.1913, § 5109;

Laws 1915, c. 91, § 1, p. 231;

C.S.1922, § 4282;

C.S.1929, § 17-431;

R.S.1943, § 17-508;

Laws 1945, c. 28, § 1, p. 140;

Laws 1945, c. 29, § 1, p. 143;

Laws 1947, c. 33, § 1(3), p. 144;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 15, p. 939;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 50;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 52;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 126.